Missouri, session 2026, HB1726.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 160, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
2 known as section 160.672, to read as follows:
160.672. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
2 (1) "Attendance center", a public school building, public school buildings, or
3 part of a public school building that offers education in a grade or grades not higher
4 than grade twelve and that constitutes one unit for accountability and reporting
5 purposes for the department of elementary and secondary education. The term
6 includes, but is not limited to, real property, an improvement to real property, or a
7 necessary fixture of an improvement to real property that is used predominantly for
8 providing instruction to pupils. The term shall not be construed to include:
9 (a) Real property, improvements to real property, or necessary fixtures of an
10 improvement to real property that are part of a federal, state, or private correctional
11 facility or facility of an institution of higher education, medical provider, or other
12 provider of professional or social services over which a school district has no control;
13 (b) A private school, as defined in section 166.700;
14 (c) A home school, as defined in section 167.012;
15 (d) An FPE school, as defined in section 167.013; or
16 (e) A cooperative including pupils that attend a private school, home school, FPE
17 school, or any combination of such entities;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1726 2
18 (2) "Bullet-resistant security laminate", optically clear film that is resistant to
19 bullets, based on Underwriters Laboratories (UL) Standard 752 Bullet-Resisting
20 Equipment, and cannot be easily breached to allow an intruder to open or otherwise
21 proceed through;
22 (3) "Department", the department of elementary and secondary education;
23 (4) "Main front entry", doors, adjacent windows, vestibule areas, and other
24 similar points of entry at the front of an attendance center;
25 (5) "Other entry", doors, adjacent windows, and other similar points of entry to
26 an attendance center that are not at the front of the attendance center;
27 (6) "Riot-resistant security laminate", optically clear film that is at least thirty-
28 five one-thousandths of an inch thick, also known as thirty-five mil, that is resistant to
29 shattering and cannot be easily breached to allow an intruder to open or otherwise
30 proceed through.
31 2. This section shall apply to all attendance centers owned, operated, or leased
32 by a school district, regardless of the date of construction or date of lease.
33 3. Each attendance center shall have access points that are:
34 (1) Secured by design;
35 (2) Maintained to operate as intended; and
36 (3) Appropriately monitored.
37 4. Each school district shall implement the following safety and security
38 standards compliance requirements for all attendance centers owned, operated, or
39 leased by the school district:
40 (1) Each attendance center shall display graphically represented alphanumerical
41 characters on both the interior and exterior of each exterior door location. The
42 characters may be installed on the door, or on at least one door at locations where more
43 than one door leads from the exterior to the same room inside the facility, or on the wall
44 immediately adjacent to or above the door location. Characters shall comply with
45 Section 505 of the 2021 International Fire Code or its successor. The main front entry of
46 an attendance center shall always be the first in the entire sequence and shall be the only
47 door location that does not require numbering. The numbering sequence shall be
48 clockwise and may be sequenced for the entire campus or for each attendance center
49 individually. The door-numbering process shall comply with accessibility requirements
50 related to signage;
51 (2) Each main front entry shall:
52 (a) Meet standards for exterior doors;
53 (b) Include a method to allow an individual located within the building to
54 visually identify an individual seeking to enter the main front entry when the entrance is

HB 1726 3
55 closed and locked including, but not limited to, windows, camera systems, intercoms, or
56 a combination of such methods;
57 (c) Feature a physical barrier that prevents unassisted access to the facility by a
58 visitor; and
59 (d) Feature a location for a visitor check-in and check-out process;
60 (3) Each exterior door shall:
61 (a) By default, be set to a closed, latched, and locked status, except that:
62 a. An exterior door may be unlocked if the door is actively monitored or within
63 an exterior secured area; and
64 b. Is a door designated in the school district's written emergency operations plan
65 or the equivalent as an exterior door that may be open for the purposes of ventilation
66 for specified periods of time if explicitly authorized by the state board of education in
67 the school facilities and safety criteria developed for the Missouri school improvement
68 program under section 160.660;
69 (b) Be constructed, both for the door and door frame and the components, of
70 materials and in a manner that makes it resistant to entry by intruders. Unless inside an
71 exterior secured area, doors constructed of glass or containing glass shall be constructed
72 or modified by means of installing security laminate to the existing glass with no
73 modifications to the door frame, such that the glass is riot-resistant when the area is
74 deemed an other entry area and bullet-resistant when the area is deemed a main front
75 entry area;
76 (c) Contain a mechanism that:
77 a. Fully closes and engages locking hardware automatically after entry or egress
78 without manual intervention, regardless of air pressure within or outside of the facility;
79 and
80 b. Allows the door to be opened from the inside when locked to allow for
81 emergency egress while remaining locked; and
82 (d) If keyed for reentry, be capable of being unlocked with a single master key or
83 a small set of master keys, whether a physical key, punch code, or key fob or similar
84 electronic key device;
85 (4) Except when inside an exterior secured area, classrooms with exterior entry
86 doors shall include a method to allow an individual located in the classroom to visually
87 identify an individual seeking to enter the classroom when the door is closed and locked
88 including, but not limited to, windows, camera systems, intercoms, or a combination of
89 such methods;
90 (5) Except when inside an exterior secured area, all windows that are adjacent to
91 an exterior door and that are greater than nine inches in height or width that, if broken,

HB 1726 4
92 would permit an individual to enter the building or to reach in and open the door from
93 the inside shall be constructed of or modified with riot-resistant security laminate when
94 the area is deemed an other entry area and bullet-resistant security laminate when the
95 area is deemed a main front entry area so that such glass cannot be easily broken;
96 (6) Except when inside an exterior secured area, all ground-level windows within
97 seven feet of the foundation near exterior doors and that are greater than nine inches in
98 height or width that, if broken, would permit an individual to enter the building or to
99 reach in and open the door from the inside shall be constructed of or modified with riot-
100 resistant security laminate when the area is deemed an other entry area and bullet-
101 resistant security laminate when the area is deemed a main front entry area so that such
102 glass cannot be easily broken to allow an intruder to enter through the window frame;
103 (7) For an interior door with a lock that allows access to an internal room where
104 gatherings occur including, but not limited to, a classroom, a teacher's lounge, or
105 another similar interior space, each window on or adjacent to such interior door that, if
106 broken, would permit an individual to enter the room or to reach in and open the door
107 from the inside shall be constructed of or modified with riot-resistant security laminate;
108 (8) If designed to be opened, all ground-level windows shall have functional
109 locking mechanisms that allow for the windows to be locked from the inside and, if large
110 enough for an individual to enter when opened or if adjacent to a door, be closed and
111 locked when school district employees are not present;
112 (9) Each roof access door shall default to a locked, latched, and closed position
113 when not actively in use and be lockable from the interior;
114 (10) Each attendance center shall include one exterior secure master key box
115 designed to permit emergency access to both law enforcement agencies and emergency
116 responders from the exterior at a location designated by the local authorities with
117 applicable jurisdiction;
118 (11) Each attendance center shall implement a communications infrastructure as
119 required in this section; and
120 (12) Each school district shall implement the following as provided in this
121 section:
122 (a) A system of ongoing auditing of building access;
123 (b) An exterior door numbering site plan; and
124 (c) A security component maintenance plan.
125 5. The system of ongoing auditing of building access required under subdivision
126 (12) of subsection 4 of this section shall include, but not be limited to, the following
127 requirements:

HB 1726 5
128 (1) Conduct at least weekly inspections during school hours of all exterior doors
129 of each attendance center to certify that all doors are, by default, set to a closed, latched,
130 and locked status and cannot be opened from the outside without a key as required in
131 subdivision (3) of subsection 4 of this section;
132 (2) Report the findings of weekly inspections required in subdivision (1) of this
133 subsection to the school district and ensure the results are kept for review as part of
134 school facilities and safety criteria developed for the Missouri school improvement
135 program under section 160.660;
136 (3) Report the findings of weekly inspections required in subdivision (1) of this
137 subsection to the administration of the attendance center to ensure awareness of any
138 deficiencies identified and identify who must take action to reduce the likelihood of
139 similar deficiencies in the future; and
140 (4) A provision in the school district's applicable policy stating that nothing in a
141 school district's access control procedures shall be interpreted as discouraging parents,
142 once properly verified as authorized attendance center visitors, from visiting attendance
143 centers they are authorized to visit.
144 6. The exterior door numbering site plan required under subdivision (12) of
145 subsection 4 of this section shall include, but not be limited to, the following
146 requirements:
147 (1) The school district shall develop and maintain an accurate site layout and
148 exterior door designation document for each attendance center that identifies all
149 exterior doors in the attendance center and depicts all exterior doors on a floor plan
150 with an alphanumeric designation, in accordance with the door numbering
151 specifications established in subdivision (1) of subsection 4 of this section;
152 (2) Each attendance center main office shall maintain readily available copies of
153 the exterior door numbering site plan; and
154 (3) Each attendance center shall supply electronic copies of exterior door
155 numbering site plans to the entity providing 911 emergency telephone service so that the
156 site plans can be made available to emergency responders by 911 emergency medical
157 dispatchers.
158 7. The security component maintenance plan required under subdivision (12) of
159 subsection 4 of this section shall include, but not be limited to, the following
160 requirements:
161 (1) The school district shall perform at least twice-yearly maintenance checks to
162 ensure the attendance center security components function as required. The
163 maintenance checks shall ensure at least the following:

HB 1726 6
164 (a) Attendance center exterior doors function properly and meet the
165 requirements of this section;
166 (b) The locking mechanism for any ground-level windows that can be opened
167 functions properly;
168 (c) All perimeter barriers and related gates function properly;
169 (d) All panic alert or similar emergency notification systems in classrooms and
170 attendance center central offices function properly, which includes at least verification
171 from multiple attendance center employees and classroom locations that a notification
172 can be issued and received by the appropriately designated employees, that the alert is
173 successfully broadcast to all attendance center employees and to appropriate law
174 enforcement agencies and emergency responders, and that a potential threat observed
175 on video triggers an alert from video surveillance monitoring systems;
176 (e) All telephones report location services properly when engaging 911
177 emergency telephone service systems;
178 (f) All exterior master key boxes function properly, and the keys they contain
179 function properly; and
180 (g) Two-way radios used by school district school protection officers or school
181 resource officers properly communicate with local law enforcement agencies and
182 emergency responders;
183 (2) The school district shall ensure procedures are in place to require that
184 employees who become aware of a security component functionality deficiency that
185 would be identified during the twice yearly maintenance review described by
186 subdivision (1) of this subsection report, in a timely manner, the deficiency to the
187 school district and the attendance center's administration, regardless of the status of the
188 twice yearly maintenance review; and
189 (3) The school district shall promptly remedy any deficiencies discovered as a
190 consequence of maintenance checks required by or reports made under this section.
191 8. (1) Each school district shall implement the requirements of subsections 3 to 7
192 of this section for the 2027-28 school year and all subsequent school years.
193 (2) Each school district shall upgrade existing attendance center security
194 laminate that does not comply with this section to riot-resistant security laminate for
195 each area deemed an other entry area and bullet-resistant security laminate for each
196 area deemed a main front entry area, as appropriate, before July 1, 2027.
197 (3) Each school district shall annually certify compliance with the requirements
198 of subsections 3 to 7 of this section as part of the ongoing audits of building access
199 required in subsection 5 of this section and maintain the certification with the

HB 1726 7
200 department and local law enforcement agencies. Any noncompliance with subsections 3
201 to 7 of this section shall be reported to the department and the school board.
202 (4) Each school district may provisionally certify compliance of an attendance
203 center security component that is not in compliance with subdivision (2) of this
204 subsection if:
205 (a) The school district has taken the necessary steps to initiate an upgrade of the
206 attendance center security component to ensure compliance; and
207 (b) For the 2027-28 school year, the contractor or supplier has been procured
208 and has provided a schedule for when the upgrade will be completed.
209 (5) Each school district shall choose a contractor to install bullet-resistant
210 security laminate and riot-resistant security laminate before July 1, 2027.
211 9. (1) There is hereby created in the state treasury the "School Safety and
212 Security Matching Grant Fund", which shall consist of moneys appropriated under
213 subsection 10 of this section. The state treasurer shall be custodian of the fund. In
214 accordance with sections 30.170 and 30.180, the state treasurer may approve
215 disbursements. The fund shall be a dedicated fund and, upon appropriation, moneys
216 in this fund shall be used solely for making matching grants for school safety and
217 security projects as provided in this section.
218 (2) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary, any moneys
219 remaining in the fund at the end of the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the
220 general revenue fund.
221 (3) The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the fund in the same manner as
222 other funds are invested. Any interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be
223 credited to the fund.
224 10. There is hereby created the "School Safety and Security Matching Grant
225 Program". The general assembly may appropriate moneys to the school safety and
226 security matching grant fund created in this section. The department shall not be
227 required to provide moneys for matching grants under this section if no appropriation
228 for such grants is made by the general assembly. The total amount appropriated to such
229 fund in a fiscal year shall not exceed the amount necessary to provide matching grants
230 to assist each school district in completing eligible projects under this section in such
231 fiscal year.
232 11. (1) For the 2027-28 school year and each subsequent school year and subject
233 to the appropriation of moneys to the school safety and security matching grant fund,
234 each school district may apply to the department for a matching grant of moneys from
235 the school safety and security matching grant fund to assist such district in completing
236 school safety and security projects under this section.

HB 1726 8
237 (2) Applications for such school safety and security projects shall be made as
238 provided by the department by rule. Each application submitted by a school district
239 shall contain at least information about the project's objectives and methods, the
240 project's estimated total cost and expenditures, an indication that the school district has
241 allocated the necessary moneys to cover the remaining percentage of the project's
242 estimated total cost and expenditures not covered by an approved matching grant
243 award amount under subsection 12 of this section, and other information required by
244 the department. Such school district shall allocate such moneys from funds distributed
245 from the classroom trust fund to such school district under section 163.043.
246 (3) After reviewing the application, the department shall determine whether the
247 project and application satisfy the necessary requirements of this section and any rules
248 promulgated under this section. If the department determines that the project and
249 application satisfy such necessary requirements, the department shall declare the
250 project to be an eligible project under this section, approve the application, approve a
251 matching grant award amount for the eligible project if moneys are available for a
252 matching grant for such school district, and notify the school district of such
253 determination and approvals.
254 (4) If the department determines that the project is not an eligible project or that
255 the application does not satisfy the necessary requirements, the department shall reject
256 the application, deny an approval of a matching grant award, and notify the school
257 district. The notice shall contain at least a description of the reasons for such
258 determination and rejection. A school district may reapply for a matching grant after
259 such rejection upon submitting an amended application addressing the elements of the
260 project or application resulting in the rejection of the initial application.
261 12. Moneys approved for a matching grant award for a school district shall be
262 equal to fifty percent of the school safety and security project.
263 13. After the school safety and security project is completed, the school district
264 shall submit the project's actual total cost and expenditures to the department as an
265 addendum to the school district's initial matching grant application. Upon receipt of
266 such actual total cost and expenditures, the department shall award the matching grant
267 moneys to the school district. No matching grant moneys awarded to a school district
268 shall exceed fifty percent of the project's actual total cost and expenditures.
269 14. School districts that have received a matching grant under this section may
270 apply for and be awarded additional matching grants under this section. The
271 department shall award matching grants to school districts that are first-time applicants
272 before awarding matching grants to school districts that have already been awarded a
273 matching grant under this section.

HB 1726 9
274 15. The department shall assign priority status to a school district that
275 demonstrates the exceptional need for physical security enhancements in such school
276 district's application and shall award matching grants to school districts demonstrating
277 such need before awarding matching grants to other applicants.
278 16. (1) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (2) of this subsection,
279 beginning on July 1, 2028, all proceeds each school district receives under section
280 163.043 shall be used only for school safety and security purposes required in this
281 section until the provisions of this section are fully implemented for such district.
282 (2) Subdivision (1) of this subsection shall not apply to a school district that has
283 entered a contract to implement or enhance school safety and security, for which work is
284 being performed under such contract, and for which all work included under such
285 contract is scheduled to be completed before January 1, 2029.
286 17. (1) Beginning on July 1, 2030, a school district that fails to comply with all
287 requirements under this section shall be classified as provisionally accredited by the
288 state board of education, except as follows:
289 (a) A school district that is determined to be noncompliant and that seeks a
290 conditional extension to meet the requirements under this section may submit evidence
291 of good cause for such noncompliance to the state board within thirty days of the state
292 board's determination to classify the school district as provisionally accredited. For
293 purposes of this paragraph, "good cause" means flood, fire, windstorm, any natural or
294 man-made disaster, or another cause as determined by the department; and
295 (b) No conditional extension approved by the state board shall extend for longer
296 than one year from the approval of the conditional extension by the state board.
297 (2) Upon certifying full compliance with this section to the state board of
298 education, the state board shall restore the school district to the district's former
299 classification if the school district meets all other requirements for the former
300 classification.
301 18. The department of elementary and secondary education may promulgate all
302 necessary rules and regulations for the administration of this section. Any rule or
303 portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the
304 authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if it complies with and is
305 subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This
306 section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
307 general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to
308 disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
309 rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after the effective date of this
310 section shall be invalid and void.

HB 1726 10
311 19. Under section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset act:
312 (1) The provisions of the new program authorized under subsections 10 to 17 of
313 this section shall automatically sunset six years after the effective date of this section
314 unless reauthorized by an act of the general assembly; and
315 (2) Subsections 10 to 17 of this section shall terminate on September first of the
316 calendar year immediately following the calendar year in which the program authorized
317 under subsections 10 to 17 of this section is sunset.
✔